Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 57 Rhode Island Higher Education Assistance Act
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-57-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Higher Education Assistance Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-2.
Findings.

The purpose of this chapter is to authorize a system of financial assistance, consisting of loan guaranties, savings programs, and other aids, for qualified students, parents, and others responsible for paying the costs of education to enable them to obtain an education beyond the high school level by attending public or private educational institutions. The general assembly has found and declares that it is in the public interest and essential to the welfare and well being of the inhabitants of the state and to the proper growth and development of the state to foster and provide financial assistance to qualified students, parents, and others responsible for paying the costs of education in order to help prospective students to obtain an education beyond the high school level. The general assembly has found that many inhabitants of the state who are fully qualified to enroll in appropriate educational institutions for furthering their education beyond the high school level lack the financial means and are unable, without financial assistance as authorized under this chapter, to pay the cost of their education, with a consequent irreparable loss to the state of valuable talents vital to its welfare. The general assembly also recognizes that educational institutions for higher education are in need of appropriate additional means to provide financial assistance to qualified students, parents, and others responsible for paying the costs of education. The general assembly has determined that the establishment of a proper system of financial assistance, containing eligibility opportunities for students and residents of this state and other states serves a public purpose and is fully consistent with the long established policy of the state to encourage, promote, and assist the education of the people of the state. The general assembly further finds that higher education financial assistance needs of Rhode Islanders will be better served by transferring all of the functions and programs of the Rhode Island higher education assistance authority to the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance and the office of the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the following meanings unless the context indicates another or different meaning or intent:

“Authority” means the governmental agency and public instrumentality previously authorized, created, and established pursuant to §

16-57-4

.

“Commissioner of postsecondary education” means the commissioner appointed by the council on postsecondary education pursuant to §

16-59-6

or his or her designee.

“Eligible borrower” means a student, or the parent of a student, who is either a resident of the state or who, under rules promulgated by the office, is qualified to make an eligible loan.

“Eligible institution,” subject to further particular or more restrictive definition by regulation of the office, means:

An institution of higher learning;

A vocational school; or

With respect to students who are nationals of the United States, an institution outside the United States that is comparable to an institution of higher education or to a vocational school and that has been approved by the commissioner of postsecondary education for purposes of the guaranteed student loan program.

“Eligible loan” means a loan to a student or to the parent of a student insured or guaranteed by the commissioner of postsecondary education, or by any other governmental or private agency, corporation, or organization having a reinsurance or guaranty agreement with the commissioner applicable to the student loan.

“Guaranteed student loan program” means the program of federal student loan insurance and reinsurance administered by the commissioner of postsecondary education.

“Lender,” subject to further particular or more restrictive definition by regulation of the office, means any governmental or private agency, corporation, organization, or institution designated as an “eligible lender” by federal statute, regulation, or administrative ruling for the purposes of the guaranteed student loan program.

“Participant” means an individual, corporation, trust, or other “person” within the meaning of § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529], who makes contributions to the tuition savings program established pursuant to §

16-57-6.1

for purposes of paying qualified higher education expenses on behalf of a beneficiary.

“Participating institution” means an institution for higher education that agrees to participate in a savings program or pre-paid tuition program established pursuant to this chapter.

“Pre-paid tuition program” means a program administered by the division, in conjunction with the executive director of the Rhode Island Student Loan Authority and the commissioner of postsecondary education, that provides a means for qualified students, parents, and others responsible for paying the costs of education to fix all or a portion of the direct cost of attendance at participating institutions in one or more future years.

“Program” means the tuition savings program established pursuant to §

16-57-6.1

.

“Qualified higher education expenses” means the costs of tuition, fees, books, supplies and equipment required for enrollment or attendance at an institution of higher education, and other education costs defined by federal law.

“Secretary” means the United States secretary of education.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

“Student,” as used with reference to the guaranteed student loan program and the parent loan program, means an individual who, under rules promulgated by the division, is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at an eligible institution and who is making suitable progress in his or her education toward obtaining a degree or other appropriate certification in accordance with standards acceptable to the authority.

“Tuition savings program” or “savings program” means a program approved and administered by the general treasurer, in conjunction with the executive director of the Rhode Island Student Loan Authority, and the commissioner of postsecondary education, designed to facilitate and encourage savings by, or on behalf of, students, future students, and parents for the purpose of paying the costs of attending institutions of higher education.

“Council” means the council on postsecondary education established pursuant to §

16-59-1

.

“Division” means the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance, the division authorized, created, and established pursuant to §

16-57-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-4.
Creation.

There is authorized, created, and established within the office of the commissioner of postsecondary education, a division of higher education assistance hereby granted and authorized to use all of the powers set forth in this chapter for the purposes of guaranteeing eligible loans to students in eligible institutions and to parents of those students and administering other programs of postsecondary student financial assistance assigned by law to the division.

The exercise by the division of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the state for public purposes. It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to vest in the office all powers, authority, rights, privileges, and titles that may be necessary to enable it to accomplish the purposes set forth in this section and this chapter, and the powers granted by it shall be liberally construed in conformity with these purposes.

The authority and its corporate existence shall be terminated on July 1, 2015, or upon approval by the U.S. Department of Education, whichever is later, and all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the division of higher education assistance, except as otherwise provided in §

16-57-6.1

, and except for any real property held by the authority, the legal title to which is hereby passed to and vested in (in trust for the state) the council on postsecondary education. The division shall continue until terminated by law or until the division shall cease entirely and continuously to conduct or be involved in any business in furtherance of its purposes; provided, that no termination shall take effect so long as the division shall have guaranties or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision shall have been made for the payment of the obligations pursuant to the documents securing them or to this law. Upon termination of the existence of the division, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state. At no time shall the assets or other property of the division enure to the benefit of any person or other corporation or entity.

Except as provided in §

16-57-6.1

, effective July 1, 2015, or upon approval by the U.S. Department of Education, whichever is later:

All functions formerly administered by the Rhode Island higher education assistance authority are hereby transferred to the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance;

The Rhode Island division of higher education assistance shall assume all rights, duties, assets, liabilities, and obligations of the former Rhode Island higher education assistance authority and the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance shall be considered to be the successor in interest to the Rhode Island higher education assistance authority; and

All contracts and agreements of whatsoever kind of the Rhode Island higher education assistance authority are hereby assigned, transferred to, and assumed by the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance.

Upon the completion of the transfer, the corporation known as the “Rhode Island higher education assistance authority” shall cease to exist. Whenever in any general law or public law reference is made to the “Rhode Island higher education assistance authority,” the reference shall be deemed to refer to and mean the “Rhode Island division of higher education assistance,” which also may be referred to as the “division.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 12; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 46; P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 488, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-6.1.
Tuition savings program.

The general treasurer, in conjunction with the division, the state investment commission, executive director of the Rhode Island student loan authority, and the commissioner of postsecondary education, shall establish, in any form as he or she deems appropriate, a tuition savings program to allow persons to save money for the sole purpose of meeting qualified higher education expenses.

All money received in connection with the tuition savings program shall be segregated from all other funds into two (2) funds, a program fund and an administrative fund. No more than two percent (2%) of money in the program fund may be transferred annually to the administrative fund for the purpose of paying operating costs of administering the tuition savings program. Money accrued by participants in the program fund may be used for payments to an eligible institution. All proceeds from the tuition savings program shall be directed to the administrative fund, and to the extent they exceed the operating costs of administering the tuition savings program, said excess shall be used for financial aid-related activities in Rhode Island pursuant to §

16-56-6

.

The state investment commission shall invest money within the program fund in any investments that are authorized by the general laws, including equities and fixed-income securities. The composition of investments shall be determined by the state investment commission.

A participant may at any time withdraw funds from the participant’s account in the tuition savings program in an amount up to the value of the account at the time the withdrawal is implemented, less such administrative fee as may be levied by the treasurer in connection with the withdrawal.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions, no administrative fee may be levied by the treasurer in the event that a participant requests withdrawal of funds from the participant’s account in the tuition savings program on account of, and within the meanings of § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529]:

The death of the beneficiary of the account;

The disability of the beneficiary; or

A scholarship, allowance, or payment received by the beneficiary to the extent that the amount of the refund does not exceed the amount of the scholarship, allowance, or payment.

In the event that a participant requests a withdrawal from an account in the tuition savings program other than: (1) A withdrawal used for qualified higher education expenses of the beneficiary of the account or (2): For a reason referred to in subdivision (e)(1), (e)(2), or (e)(3) of this section, the treasurer shall impose a more than de minimis penalty on the earnings portion of the withdrawal in accordance with § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529]; provided that no penalty shall be imposed with respect to any such withdrawal, or any other withdrawal, from any account in the tuition savings plan to which the tax made applicable by § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529] is effective.

[Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-6.2.
Ownership of assets — Transfer of ownership rights.

The participant retains ownership of all assets properly allocated to an account maintained for the participant in the tuition savings program up to the date of withdrawal or distribution of these from the program.

All assets of the tuition savings program shall be considered to be held in trust. As required by the Internal Revenue Code, no interest in the tuition savings program or any portion of these may be used as security for a loan.

A participant may transfer ownership rights in the tuition savings program to another participant or designate a new beneficiary insofar as permitted by § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529] under such conditions as the treasurer deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-6.3.
Tax-exempt earnings.

For state income tax purposes, annual earnings of the tuition savings program and the prepaid tuition program shall be exempt from tax to the program, and shall not be includible in the Rhode Island income of either beneficiaries or participants in the program until withdrawn or distributed from it, and then in accordance with chapter 30 of title 44.

The tax administrator may adopt rules and regulations necessary to monitor, implement, and administer the Rhode Island personal income tax provisions referred to in subsection (a) relating to this chapter. These regulations shall provide for each taxable year for the timely submission to the tax administrator by the program manager of the tuition savings program of this information in the form the tax administrator shall prescribe concerning contributions to, and withdrawals including transfers and rollovers from, the tuition savings program during that year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-6.4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 14, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 53, effective July 6, 2001.

16-57-6.5.
Annual audited financial report to the governor and general assembly.

The treasurer shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state an annual, audited financial report, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, on the operations of the tuition savings program by November 1 of each year. The annual audit shall be made either by the auditor general or by an independent, certified public accountant approved by the auditor general and shall include direct and indirect costs attributable to the use of outside consultants, independent contractors, and any other persons who are not state employees.

The annual audited financial report shall be supplemented by the following information, to be submitted by April 1 of each year, on the operations of the program for the previous calendar year:

A summary of the benefits provided by the tuition savings program including the number of participants and beneficiaries;

Any other information that is relevant in order to make a full, fair, and effective disclosure of the assets and operations of the program; and

The foregoing supplemental information shall be posted electronically on the general assembly’s and the secretary of state’s websites as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The treasurer shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 332, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 435, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-6.6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 21, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-6.7.
Construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate the purposes and intent of this chapter. It is intended that the tuition savings program established pursuant to this chapter qualify as a “qualified state tuition program” pursuant to § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 529. The provisions of this chapter shall be construed wherever possible to effectuate this intent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 91, § 2.

16-57-7.
Council on postsecondary education.

The council on postsecondary education established pursuant to §

16-59-1

shall retain all authority formerly vested in the higher education assistance authority board of directors, except as provided by §

16-57-6.1

. Whenever in any general or public law reference is made to the “board of directors of the higher education assistance authority,” the reference shall be deemed to refer to and mean the “council on postsecondary education.” The council on postsecondary education shall be the employer of record for the division of higher education assistance.

No full-time employee shall, during the period of his or her employment by the division, engage in any other private employment, profession, or business, except with the approval of the commissioner of postsecondary education; provided, that the executive director shall not engage in any other private employment, profession, or business, including, but not limited to, consulting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 21; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 38, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 332, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 435, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-8.
Designated agency.

The division established within the office of the postsecondary commissioner is designated the state agency to apply for, receive, accept, and disburse federal funds, and funds from other public and private sources, made available to the state for use as reserves to guarantee student loans or as administrative money to operate student loan programs, and is designated to administer any statewide programs of student assistance that shall be established under federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-9.
Loans to minors — Loan obligations.

Any person qualifying for an eligible loan shall not be disqualified to receive a loan guaranteed by the division by reason of his or her being a minor. For the purpose of applying for, securing, receiving, and repaying a loan, any person shall be deemed to have full legal capacity to act and shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of a person of full age with respect to a loan.

No loan obligation incurred by any individual under the provisions of this chapter may be expunged, reduced, or discharged in any proceeding, including any proceeding in federal bankruptcy court. Any individual receiving a loan under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to sign an affidavit acknowledging the loan and agreeing to this condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-10.
Reserve funds.

To ensure the continued operation and solvency of the guaranteed student loan program, the office of the postsecondary commissioner shall create and establish reserve funds, and may pay into the funds any money appropriated and made available by the state or any other source for the purpose of the funds, and any money collected by the division as fees for the guaranty of eligible loans.

Furthermore, it is the intent of the general assembly that these funds eventually be used to increase financial assistance to Rhode Island students in the form of scholarships and grants as approved by the commissioner of postsecondary education and as directed by the U.S. Department of Education and in accordance with federal statutes and regulations governing the use of funds in the guaranty agency’s operating fund pursuant to the provisions and restrictions of the 1998 reauthorization of the federal Higher Education Act.

[Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 63; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 14, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-12.
Credit of state.

Guaranties made under the provisions of this chapter shall not constitute debts, liabilities, or obligations of the state or of any political subdivision of the state other than the division of higher education assistance or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision other than the division of higher education assistance, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of reserve funds set forth in §

16-57-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.

16-57-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 12, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-16.
Inconsistent provisions.

If the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or ordinance, general, special, or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1.

16-57-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

16-57-18.
Construction.

This chapter being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1.

16-57-19.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 1.